test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-vannw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - vannõ: # Verb 39 'eng /est vanduda/fin' - full paradigm
     vannõ+V+Inf: vannõ
     vannõ+V+Ger: vannõs
     vannõ+V+Sup: vannõm
     vannõ+V+Sup+Ine: vannõmõs
     vannõ+V+Sup+Ela: vannõmõst
     vannõ+V+Sup+Tra: vannõmõks
     vannõ+V+Sup+Abe: vannõmõt
     vannõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vǭnõb
     vannõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vannõt
     vannõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vannõbõd
     vannõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vǭniz
     vannõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vǭnizt, vǭniztõ]
     vannõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vǭnizt, vǭniztõ]
     vannõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: van
     vannõ+V+Cond+Sg3: vannõks
     vannõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: van
     vannõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: van
     vannõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vannõgid
     vannõ+V+Jus+Sg3: vannõg
     vannõ+V+Quo+Sg3: vanniji
     vannõ+V+ActPrfPrc: vannõn
     vannõ+V+PssPrfPrc: vandõd
